Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 30. Frozen Foods

§ 441.
Prohibition.

No person engaged in the business of processing or storing consumer frozen foods or foods which have been frozen, or transporting, selling, or offering for sale such foods shall process, store, handle, transport, advertise, display, or offer for sale such foods unless such operations are conducted in accordance with the provisions of the rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets after a public hearing.
“Secretary” shall mean the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or his or her designated agent.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 442.
Administration; jurisdiction.

This chapter shall be administered by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets in concurrent jurisdiction with other state and federal agencies and shall not alter or affect the powers of these agencies.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 443.
Regulations; hearing; inspections.

The Secretary may, after public hearing, revise regulations and make additional regulations for such operations, including temperature control, sanitation, and other matters.

The Secretary may enter premises or vehicles conducting such operations at reasonable times as he or she finds necessary in the administration of this chapter. He or she may require evidence of source and destination of the product, take temperatures, open containers, and he or she may, upon tendering the market price, remove samples from the premises for further examination.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 444.
Reinspection.

The Secretary may, in instances such as a first offense, make due allowance for initial corrective action, minor violation, or extenuating circumstances, and employ reinspection or other preliminary steps to secure compliance.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 445.
Penalties.

Any person violating this chapter, or any regulation made under its authority, shall be fined not more than $100.00 for the first offense, and not more than $200.00 for each subsequent offense. Each day in which a violation exists shall constitute a separate violation.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.